Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3525
Roster; fee.

(1) The board shall maintain and make available a complete roster showing the names and last-known addresses of all professional geologists.

(2) Any person may request a copy of such complete roster from the board. The board may charge a fee for distributing such requested copy in accordance with sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 73;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 20.